Illinois, session 104th, HB813.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Cigarette Use Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 36 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 135/36)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.66)7    Sec. 36. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Cigarette Use Tax Act."9(Source: Laws 1951, p. 1380.)